Georgia, session 2025_26, SB277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 5 of Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to drug abuse
treatment and education programs, is amended in Code Section 26-5-3, relating to
definitions, by revising paragraph (4) as follows:
"(4) 'Drugs' means any substance defined as a drug by federal or Georgia law or any
other chemical substance which may be used in lieu of a drug to obtain similar effects,
with the exception of including alcohol and its derivatives."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 277
- 1 -